District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1217.49

Limited liability.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-132, § 209, 55 DCR 1668
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7082, 57 DCR 6242
Section 9001 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2010.